Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2826.01
Long-term care facility, defined.

Long-term care facility means an intermediate care facility, an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities, a long-term care hospital, a mental health substance use treatment center, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2009, LB195, § 49;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 8;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 43.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.